test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-daebmuk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - däbmuk: # N_ODD (no alternations except final 'devoicing'; -u- does not trigger VH because it has already been triggered during derivation (from á))
    däbmuk+N+Sg+Nom: däbmuk
    däbmuk+N+Sg+Gen: däbmuga
    däbmuk+N+Sg+Acc: däbmugav
    däbmuk+N+Sg+Ill: däbmugij
    däbmuk+N+Sg+Ine: däbmugin
    däbmuk+N+Sg+Ela: [däbmugist, däbmugis]
    däbmuk+N+Sg+Com: däbmugijn
    däbmuk+N+Pl+Nom: däbmuga
    däbmuk+N+Pl+Gen: däbmugij
    däbmuk+N+Pl+Acc: däbmugijd
    däbmuk+N+Pl+Ill: däbmugijda
    däbmuk+N+Pl+Ine: däbmugijn
    däbmuk+N+Pl+Ela: [däbmugijst, däbmugijs]
    däbmuk+N+Pl+Com: [däbmugij, däbmugijgum]
    däbmuk+N+Ess: däbmugin
    däbmuk+N+Abe: däbmugahtá

 
 
